Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB678.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Labor Broker Registration Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Account." The Labor Broker Registration Account established under section 11."Construction." Erection, reconstruction, demolition, alteration, modification, custom fabrication, building, assembling, site preparation and repair OR MAINTENANCE work done on any real property or premises under contract, whether or not the work is for a public body and paid for from public funds."CONTRACTOR." A PERSON THAT, IN ANY CAPACITY FOR COMPENSATION, ENGAGES IN CONSTRUCTION. THE TERM INCLUDES A SUBCONTRACTOR OF ANY TIER."Debar." As follows:(1) Action taken by the secretary to prohibit a contractor, subcontractor or person from contracting with or participating in contracts for public work for a period of at least three years.20250HB0678PN3057 - 2 - <--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) The debarment shall include all divisions or other organizational elements of a contractor or subcontractor unless limited by its terms to specific divisions or organizational elements.(3) The debarment may apply to affiliates or other persons or entities associated with the contractor, subcontractor or individual if they are specifically named and given written notice of the debarment and an opportunity to appeal.(4) The debarment shall apply to a successor entity. An entity shall be a successor entity if it:(i) has one or more of the same principals or officers as the employer against whom the order was issued;(ii) performs similar work within the same geographical area;(iii) occupies the same premises;(iv) shares the same telephone number or facsimile number;(v) has the same email address or Internet website;(vi) employs substantially the same workforce or administrative employees, or both;(vii) utilizes the same tools, equipment or facilities;(viii) employs or engages the services of any person or persons involved in the direction or control of the other; or(ix) lists substantially the same work experience."Department." The Department of Labor and Industry of the Commonwealth.20250HB0678PN3057 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Employee." As follows:(1) An individual performing a service or labor for an employer for wages, remuneration or other compensation.(2) The term includes:(i) In relation to workers' compensation, as the term "employe" is defined in section 104 of the Workers' Compensation Act.(ii) In relation to unemployment compensation, as the term "employe" is defined in section 4(i) of the Unemployment Compensation Law."Employer." As follows:(1) A person, including an agent of the person, that engages the services of an employee for wages, remuneration or other compensation.(2) The term includes:(i) In relation to workers' compensation, as the term "employer" is defined in section 103 of the Workers' Compensation Act.(ii) In relation to unemployment compensation, as the term "employer" is defined in section 4(j) of the Unemployment Compensation Law."Labor broker." As follows:(1) An entity or individual that supplies construction workers to an employer OR CONTRACTOR for the performance of construction work or for a construction project of the employer OR CONTRACTOR on a site in this Commonwealth in exchange for compensation from the employer OR CONTRACTOR, provided that the completion of the project is directed by the employer OR CONTRACTOR and not the entity or individual.(2) The term does not include a construction 20250HB0678PN3057 - 4 - <--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 subcontractor that is responsible for and carries out all of the following:(i) Performing construction work on a project in accordance with a written contract for a defined scope of construction work at a fixed price.(ii) Obtaining necessary licenses or permits to perform construction services under the entity's or individual's name.(iii) Exclusively controlling the work of any subcontractor, including the authority to hire and fire and to direct the methods and means of construction work performed on the construction project.(iv) Paying wages and fringe benefits to workers through any subcontractor and not through any other entity or individual and maintaining required employment and payroll records by the subcontractor.(v) Purchasing the majority of materials, supplies and tools for construction work performed by the subcontractor on the construction project.(vi) Maintaining workers' compensation and unemployment insurance coverage for periods preceding, during and succeeding the terms of the construction project for the type and scope of construction performed by the subcontractor on the construction project."Person." An individual, firm, sole proprietorship, partnership, corporation, association or other entity."Public body." Any of the following:(1) The Commonwealth.(2) A political subdivision, including a county, city, borough, incorporated town, township or municipal authority, 20250HB0678PN3057 - 5 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 of this Commonwealth.(3) An authority created by the General Assembly.(4) An instrumentality or agency of the Commonwealth.(5) A school district of this Commonwealth."Secretary." The Secretary of Labor and Industry of the Commonwealth or the authorized representative of the Secretary of Labor and Industry of the Commonwealth."SUBCONTRACTOR." A PERSON THAT HAS CONTRACTED TO FURNISH LABOR OR MATERIALS TO OR HAS PERFORMED LABOR FOR A CONTRACTOR OR ANOTHER SUBCONTRACTOR IN CONNECTION WITH A CONTRACT. THE TERM DOES NOT INCLUDE A PERSON THAT ONLY SUPPLIES MATERIAL FOR A CONSTRUCTION PROJECT."Unemployment Compensation Law." The act of December 5, 1936 (2nd Sp.Sess., 1937 P.L.2897, No.1), known as the Unemployment Compensation Law."Workers' Compensation Act." The act of June 2, 1915 (P.L.736, No.338), known as the Workers' Compensation Act.Section 3. Prohibition.A ON AND AFTER THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS SECTION, A person may not hold oneself out or engage in any act as a labor broker without satisfying the registration requirements under this act.Section 4. Proof of registration.A labor broker shall include the labor broker's registration number issued by the department in all advertisements distributed within this Commonwealth and on all contracts, estimates and related documents created after the effective date of this section.Section 5. Verification system.The department shall develop and maintain a list of completed registrations under this act on the department's publicly 20250HB0678PN3057 - 6 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 accessible Internet website, which shall include each labor broker's legal business name, any assumed business name, business address, verification number and verification expiration date.Section 6. Registration.(a) Application.--A labor broker shall apply, in writing or electronically, for registration in a manner and on a form prescribed by the department.(b) Contents.--The registration form shall include the following information:(1) For any individual, sole proprietor, primary owner or officer of a business entity, all of the following information:(i) The applicant's full legal name and title at the applicant's business.(ii) The applicant's business address and telephone number.(iii) The applicant's Federal identification number or Federal tax identification number used for business purposes.(iv) All prior business names and addresses of the applicant.(v) A statement whether:(A) the applicant, even in doing so as part of a business entity application, has ever been convicted of, or pleaded guilty or no contest to, a criminal offense related to fraud, theft, a crime of deception, a crime involving fraudulent business practices or employee misclassification;(B) the applicant, even if doing so as part of a 20250HB0678PN3057 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 business entity application, has ever been found to have misclassified employees as independent contractors by the department, any other state or political subdivision or the United States Department of Labor; and(C) the applicant's certification or a similar certificate or license issued by any other state or political subdivision has ever been revoked or suspended pursuant to an order issued by a court of competent jurisdiction and, if so, the current status of the certification or similar certificate or license. The statement required by this clause shall include the same information with respect to any other business in which the applicant has or has ever had an interest.(2) The legal business name, any assumed business name, designated business address, physical address, telephone number and email address of the applicant.(3) For an out-of-State business entity, the legal business name, any assumed business name, designated business address, physical address, telephone number and email address of the applicant and any identification number issued to the applicant by the applicant's state or political subdivision through registration, licensing or verification systems, if applicable.(4) For any individual, sole proprietor, primary owner or officer, including a chief executive officer, chief financial officer, chief operating officer or an equivalent officer, of a business entity, the name of all other persons with an ownership interest in the applicant that are not 20250HB0678PN3057 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 identified under paragraph (1). This paragraph does not apply to shareholders with less than a 5% ownership interest in a publicly traded corporation.(5) A description of the nature of the business of the applicant.(6) Whether the applicant has been suspended or debarred within the last 10 years.(7) Proof of financial responsibility, which may include liability insurance or bonding, or self-insurance.(8) The fee specified under section 10.(9) A signed statement by the applicant that the information in the application is true and accurate and any individual signing the application is an authorized agent of the applicant subject to the penalties under 18 Pa.C.S. § 4904 (relating to unsworn falsification to authorities).Section 7. Expiration and renewal.(a) Dates.--The registration shall be completed on a fixed, biennial basis on a date determined by the department.(b) Acceptance.--The department shall accept an application for a registration renewal before the expiration of an active registration in a time frame specified by the department.Section 8. Certification of compliance.After a labor broker completes an application for registration or registration renewal under this act and pays the fee specified under section 10, the department shall issue a certificate of compliance to the labor broker that includes a registration number.Section 9. Reporting changes.A labor broker shall update its registration within 30 days of any change in personal or business information required to be 20250HB0678PN3057 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 provided to the department under this act.Section 10. Fees.(a) Amount.--An applicant for registration or registration renewal under this act shall pay an application fee of not more than $300 to the department.(b) Deposit.--Fees under subsection (a) shall be deposited into the account.Section 11. Labor Broker Registration Account.(a) Establishment.--The Labor Broker Registration Account is established as a restricted revenue, interest-bearing account in the General Fund.(b) Deposit.--The department shall deposit fees and penalties collected under this act into the account.(c) Appropriation.--Money in the account and interest earned on the money are appropriated on a continuing basis to the department for administering and enforcing the provisions of this act.Section 12. Prohibited acts.(a) Specific prohibitions.--On or after the effective date of this subsection, a person who holds oneself out THAT REPRESENTS ITSELF, or engages in any act, as a labor broker may not do any of the following:(1) Fail to complete the registration as a labor broker as required under this act.(2) Fail to display or identify its registration number as required under section 4.(3) Knowingly make a false statement in the application for labor broker registration.(4) Knowingly contract with or perform work as a labor broker for another person:20250HB0678PN3057 - 10 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (i) without first completing the registration required under this act; or(ii) after the registration required under this act has expired or has been suspended.(5) Knowingly contract with or pay another person for work as a labor broker if:(i) the person has not completed the registration required under this act; or(ii) the person's registration required under this act has expired or has been suspended.(b) Verification.--A person seeking to contract or engage with a purported labor broker shall verify the registration of the purported labor broker using the verification system described in section 5.(c) Unregistered labor broker.--(1) A person, including an agent of a person, may not contract with or engage the services of an unregistered labor broker.(2) A person found to have engaged with an unregistered labor broker shall be subject to penalties described under section 14.Section 13. Investigations.(a) Authorization.--If the secretary receives information indicating that a person has violated this act, the secretary may investigate the matter.(b) Permitted actions.--The secretary may take any of the following actions:(1) Enter and inspect a worksite or place of business at any reasonable time to examine and inspect records that relate to the compliance of this act.20250HB0678PN3057 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) Subpoena witnesses, administer oaths, examine witnesses and copy or compel the production of records, contracts and other documents that are necessary and appropriate to the enforcement of this act.(3) Petition Commonwealth Court to enforce any subpoena or order issued by the department under this act.Section 14. Penalties.The following penalties apply:(1) A person that violates OR HAS KNOWLEDGE OF A VIOLATION OF section 12(a)(1) or (2) shall be subject to the following:(i) For a first violation, the department shall issue a warning letter to the person detailing the omission VIOLATION and provide 30 days to correct the violation.(ii) For a second or subsequent violation, the department shall bring an administrative action to assess a fine of up to $2,500 for each day that the labor broker is not registered.(2) For a violation of section 12(a)(3), (4) or (5), the department shall bring an administrative action to assess a fine of up to $10,000 per violation.(3) A person that violates section 12(b) or (c) shall be subject to the following:(i) For a first violation, the department shall issue a fine of no more than $25,000. WARNING LETTER TO THE PERSON DETAILING THE VIOLATION AND PROVIDE 30 DAYS TO CORRECT THE VIOLATION.(ii) For a second or any subsequent violations, the department shall issue a fine not to exceed $25,000 20250HB0678PN3057 - 12 - <--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 $2,500 per day per worker provided by the unregistered labor broker.(4) The secretary may debar or prohibit a person from registering OR RENEWING REGISTRATION as a labor broker that violates any of the provisions of section 12.(5) The secretary shall waive a penalty for a violation of section 12(a)(5), (b) or (c) by a person if the person or employer is able to provide evidence to the secretary of a good faith effort to comply with this act. The secretary shall determine that a person has provided evidence of a good faith effort under this paragraph if the person can prove to the department that the person verified the registration of a labor broker under section 5 and the labor broker was registered in accordance with this act at the time of the verification.Section 15. Suspension of registration.(a) Reasons.--The secretary may suspend a labor broker's registration for failing to comply with an investigation under section 13, failing to pay penalties imposed in accordance with section 14 or otherwise failing to correct a violation as required by section 14.(b) Appeal.--A suspension under subsection (a) shall be subject to appeal of the administrative action.Section 16. Other relief.In addition to the penalties specified under this act, the department may seek other relief, including injunctive relief and costs, reasonable attorney fees and investigation costs.SECTION 17. EDUCATIONAL EFFORTS.(A) EDUCATIONAL MATERIALS AND GUIDANCE.--THE DEPARTMENT SHALL PREPARE EDUCATIONAL MATERIALS AND GUIDANCE FOR THE 20250HB0678PN3057 - 13 - <--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 IMPLEMENTATION OF THIS ACT.(B) EFFORTS TO PUBLICIZE.--BEGINNING NO LATER THAN SIX MONTHS PRIOR TO THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL CONDUCT EFFORTS TO PUBLICIZE THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS ACT, WHICH EFFORTS MAY INCLUDE:(1) POSTING EDUCATIONAL MATERIALS AND GUIDANCE ON THE DEPARTMENT'S PUBLICLY ACCESSIBLE INTERNET WEBSITE AND THROUGH SOCIAL MEDIA PLATFORMS.(2) HOSTING EDUCATIONAL MEETINGS OR WEBINARS FOR STAKEHOLDERS IN PREPARATION FOR THE IMPLEMENTATION OF THIS ACT.Section 17 18. Regulations.The department may promulgate regulations as necessary to implement and administer this act.Section 18 19. Effective date.This act shall take effect in one year. AS FOLLOWS:(1) THE FOLLOWING SHALL TAKE EFFECT IMMEDIATELY:SECTION 17(A).SECTION 18.THIS SECTION.(2) The remainder of this act shall take effect in one year.20250HB0678PN3057 - 14 - <--<--<--12345678910111213141516171819202122